Missouri, session 2026, HB2336.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the state of Missouri, as follows:
Section 1. 1. The governor is hereby authorized and empowered to sell, transfer,
grant, convey, remise, release, and forever quitclaim all interest of the state of Missouri
in property located in the City of Harrisonville, Cass County, Missouri. The property to
be conveyed is more particularly described as follows:
A part of Lot One (1) of the Northwest Quarter of Section 3, Township 44, Range
31, Harrisonville, Cass County, Missouri described as follows: Beginning at the
Northeast corner of that tract of land described in deed of record in Book 558,
Page 396 of the Recorder of Deeds Office, Cass County, Missouri, and being on
the North line of said Lot 1 a distance of 268.55 feet from the Northwest Corner
of said Lot 1; run thence North 89 degrees 36 minutes 50 seconds West along the
North line of said Lot 1 a distance of 200 feet; run thence South 0 degrees 12
minutes 00 seconds West a distance of 435 feet to a point; thence South 89
degrees 30 minutes 10 seconds East 200 feet; run thence North 0 degrees 12
minutes East to the place or point of beginning, a distance of 435 feet, together
with a pertinent easement for roadway purposes over the following described
tract: A part of Lot One (1) of the Northeast Quarter of Section 4, and A part of
Lot One (1) of the Northwest Quarter of Section 3, all in Township 44, Range 31,
Harrisonville, Cass County, Missouri, described as follows: Beginning at the
Northeast corner of Lot 1 of the Northeast Quarter of Section 4, Township 44,
Range 31; running thence North 89 degrees 30 minutes 10 seconds West along
the North line of said Lot 1 a distance of 226.51 feet to the West line of James
EXPLANATION — Matter enclosed in bold-faced brackets [thus] in the above bill is not enacted and is
intended to be omitted from the law. Matter in bold-face type in the above bill is proposed language.

HCS HB 2336 2
Street; run thence South 50 feet; run thence East a distance of 295.06 feet; run
thence North 50 feet to the North line of Lot 1 of the Northwest Quarter of
Section 3, Township 44, Range 31; run thence North 89 degrees 30 minutes 10
seconds West along the North line of said Lot 1 to the place of beginning.
2. The commissioner of administration shall set the terms and conditions for the
conveyance as the commissioner deems reasonable. Such terms and conditions may
include, but not be limited to, the number of appraisals required and the time, place,
and terms of the conveyance.
3. The attorney general shall approve the form of the instrument of conveyance.
Section 2. 1. The governor is hereby authorized and empowered to sell, transfer,
grant, convey, remise, release, and forever quitclaim all interest of the state of Missouri
in property located in the City of Kirksville, Adair County, Missouri. The property to
be conveyed is more particularly described as follows:
A TRACT OF LAND SITUATED IN THE NORTHWEST QUARTER OF
SECTION 15, TOWNSHIP 62 NORTH, RANGE 15 WEST, CITY OF
KIRKSVILLE, ADAIR COUNTY, MISSOURI AND BEING MORE
PARTICULARLY DESCRIBED AS FOLLOWS:
BEGINNING AT A PK NAIL FOUND IN CONCRETE BEING THE
NORTHWEST CORNER OF LOT 1 OF CHARITON SUBDIVISION AND
THE SOUTH RIGHT OF WAY LINE OF LAHARPE STREET;
THENCE ALONG SAID LOT AS FOLLOWS S00°06'25"W A DISTANCE OF
179.65' TO AN IRON ROD FOUND;
THENCE N89°42'12"E A DISTANCE OF 210.17' TO AN IRON ROD FOUND
AT THE SOUTHEAST CORNER OF SAID LOT;
THENCE S00°06'47"W A DISTANCE OF 317.96' TO AN IRON ROD FOUND
ON THE NORTH LINE OF A SURVEY RECORDED IN PLAT BOOK 1000,
PAGE 1;
THENCE ALONG SAID SURVEY AS FOLLOWS: S89°37'55"W A DISTANCE
OF 824.78' TO AN IRON ROD FOUND;
THENCE N00°03'54"E A DISTANCE OF 498.89' TO AN IRON ROD FOUND
ON THE SOUTH RIGHT OF WAY LINE OF LAHARPE STREET;
THENCE ALONG SAID RIGHT OF WAY LINE, N89°43'39"E A DISTANCE
OF 615.00' TO THE POINT OF BEGINNING.
THE ABOVE TRACT OF LAND CONTAINS 8.57 ACRES MORE OR LESS,
SUBJECT TO EASEMENTS AND RESTRICTIONS OF RECORD, OR NOT
OF RECORD, IF ANY.

HCS HB 2336 3
2. The commissioner of administration shall set the terms and conditions for the
conveyance as the commissioner deems reasonable. Such terms and conditions may
include, but not be limited to, the number of appraisals required and the time, place,
and terms of the conveyance.
3. The attorney general shall approve the form of the instrument of conveyance.
Section 3. 1. The governor is hereby authorized and empowered to sell, transfer,
grant, convey, remise, release, and forever quitclaim all interest of the state of Missouri
in property located in the City of Springfield, Greene County, Missouri. The property
to be conveyed is more particularly described as follows:
Tract 1:
Beginning at the Southwest Corner of a ten (10) story building, as the same
existed on August 24, 1963, said building known as the Landers Building in the
City of Springfield, Greene County, Missouri, which beginning point is 1.63 feet
South of the South line of Lot Seventeen (17) in Block Five (5) of the first tier of
lots, according to the original plat of the City of Springfield, in Greene County,
Missouri, and is 11.07 feet East of the West line of said Lot Seventeen (17); thence
Northerly along the West Wall of said Landers Building to the Northwest Corner
thereof, which latter point is 10.69 feet East of the West line of said Lot Seventeen
(17) and 68.07 feet North of the South line of said Lot Seventeen (17); thence East
along the North line of said Landers Building to a point on the West line of
Boonville Avenue in the City of Springfield, Missouri, which latter point is 67 feet
North of the Southeast Corner of said Lot Seventeen (17); thence South along the
East line of said Landers Building to the Southeast Corner thereof which latter
point is 0.22 feet East and 2.10 Feet South of the Southeast Corner of said Lot
Seventeen (17); thence Westerly along the South line of said Landers Building to
the point of beginning, all in the City of Springfield, Greene County, Missouri.
Tract 2:
Beginning 69 feet North of the Southeast corner of Lot 17, Block 5 in the Original
Plat of the Town of Springfield, Missouri, running thence North 43.8 feet to Olive
Street, thence West 103.2 feet to Baker Arcade, thence South 43.3 feet, thence
East 103.2 feet to point of beginning, all in the City of Springfield, Greene
County, Missouri.
Tract 3:
All space occupied by grantor hereunder and extending under the sidewalks on
the East and South sides of the exterior of “The Landers Building”, and the
exterior stairway on the West side of “The Landers Building”, all of which are
outside of the perimeters of the property described in the Warranty Deed by

HCS HB 2336 4
Corporation dated the 8th day of September, 1978 by and between the grantor
and grantee named herein.
Tract 4:
The South 69 feet of Lot Seventeen (17), Block Five (5), first tier of lots,
according to the original plat of the City of Springfield, the said lot or tract of
land more particularly described as follows:
Beginning on the West side of Boonville Street, in the City of Springfield, on the
North side of the public square at the point of intersection of said Boonville
Street and the public square, thence West 107.32 feet, thence North 69 feet,
thence East 107.32 feet, thence South 69 feet to the place of beginning.
Tract 5:
A part of Lot Seventeen (17), Block Five (5), first tier of lots, according to the
original plat of the City of Springfield, Greene County, Missouri, described as
follows:
Beginning at a point 112.82 feet, more or less, North of the Southeast corner of
aforesaid Lot Seventeen (17), said point being the point of intersection of the
West line of Boonville Avenue and the South line of Olive Street, as the same are
located and established on December 20, 1978, thence West along said South line
of Olive Street 103.2 feet, more or less, to the East line of Baker Arcade, thence
South along said East line of Baker Arcade 45.33 feet, more or less to the point of
intersection of said East line of Baker Arcade with the Northerly line of a tract
conveyed to the State of Missouri by warranty deed recorded in Book 1695, page
12, thence Easterly along the Northerly line of said last-mentioned tract, and the
Easterly extension of the Northerly line thereof, a distance of 103.2 feet, more or
less, to the West line of Boonville Avenue, thence North 45.82 feet, more or less, to
the point of beginning.
2. The commissioner of administration shall set the terms and conditions for the
conveyance as the commissioner deems reasonable. Such terms and conditions may
include, but not be limited to, the number of appraisals required and the time, place,
and terms of the conveyance.
3. The attorney general shall approve the form of the instrument of conveyance.
Section 4. 1. The governor is hereby authorized and empowered to sell, transfer,
grant, convey, remise, release, and forever quitclaim all interest of the state of Missouri
in property located in the City of Springfield, Greene County, Missouri. The property
to be conveyed is more particularly described as follows:
Beginning at a point on the North side of East Walnut Street 431 5/6 feet East of
the Southwest corner of Lot 84, Block 23, of the Original Plat of Springfield,

HCS HB 2336 5
Missouri, which point is the Southeast corner of James E. Keet's Lot, thence East
along the North side of East Walnut Street to fence of J. L. Carson's Lot, thence
North along said fence and on line with same 240 feet, thence West to the East
line of Keet's Lot, thence South with Keet's East Line to beginning, being 86 feet
front on East Walnut Street, more or less, all in the City of Springfield, Greene
County, Missouri,
"Beginning on the North line of East Walnut Street at the Southwest corner of
Bray lot, thence West 82-1/2 feet to the East line of a lot formerly owned by
Charles T. Keet, thence North 240 feet thence West 82-1/2 feet, thence North 27-
1/2 feet, thence East 165 feet, thence South 267 feet to the beginning, all in the
Southeast quarter of the Northwest quarter of Section 24, Township 29, Range
22, except that part deeded in Book 1555, page 1689, described as beginning on
the North line of East Walnut Street in Springfield, Missouri, at the Southwest
corner of the Bray Lot, said beginning point being 165.31 feet Southeast of the
Northeast corner of Benton Alley, and Walnut; thence West 82.5 feet to the East
line of lot formerly owned by Charles T. Keet; thence North 240 feet to point of
new beginning; thence West 82.5 feet at an exterior angle of 89 degrees 50 min.,
thence North 24.7 feet at an interior angel of 89 degrees 43 min., thence East 82.4
feet more or less thence South 23.1 feet to point of beginning all in the Southeast
Quarter of the Northwest quarter, Section 24, Township 29, Range 22."
Beginning on the South side of St. Louis Street at a point fifty (50) feet west of the
Northwest corner of a lot known at one time as the W. J. McDaniel Lot, which
point is now the Northwest corner of the Simmons Lot (formerly the A. J.
Clements lot), thence West along the South side of St. Louis Street fifty (50) feet
to Bryan's Northeast corner, thence South to South Alley now McDaniel Street,
thence East fifty (50) feet to the Southwest corner of the lot formerly belonging to
said Clements, thence North to the beginning, all in the City of Springfield,
Missouri. Also described as Beginning 50 feet West of the Northwest corner of
Lot 1, Kimbroughs Addition, West 50 feet, thence South 222 feet to McDaniel
Street, East 50 feet, North to the beginning.
Commencing at the northeast corner of Walnut and Jefferson Streets; thence
South 87°53'42" East 310.5 feet along the north right-of-way line of Walnut
Street to an iron pin; thence North 0°45'23" West 206.81 feet to an iron pin for a
point of beginning; thence continuing North 0°45'23" West 181.83 feet to a
chiseled "X" in concrete on the South right-of-way line of McDaniel Street;
thence North 89°06' East 107.19 feet along the South right-of-way line of
McDaniel Street to an iron pin; thence South 1°24'33" East 184.71 feet to an iron

HCS HB 2336 6
pin; thence North 89°23'31" West 109.33 feet to the point of beginning.
Containing 0.45 acres in the City of Springfield, Greene County, Missouri.
2. The commissioner of administration shall set the terms and conditions for the
conveyance as the commissioner deems reasonable. Such terms and conditions may
include, but not be limited to, the number of appraisals required and the time, place,
and terms of the conveyance.
3. The attorney general shall approve the form of the instrument of conveyance.
Section 5. 1. The governor is hereby granted and empowered to sell, transfer,
grant, or convey an easement over, on, or under property located in the City of Festus,
Jefferson County, Missouri. The easement is more particularly described as follows:
Part of a larger tract of land described in Deed Book 70 at Page 115, lying in
United States Survey Number 910, Township 40 North, Range 5 East of the Fifth
Principal Meridian, Jefferson County, Missouri. Being further described as
follows:
Beginning at a point lying South 70°37'31" West, a distance of 69.85 feet from the
Northeast Corner of said larger tract; thence South 25°30'00" East, a distance of
58.27 feet; thence South 82°46'45" East, a distance of 17.98 feet to the beginning
of a curve tangent to said line; thence easterly and southeasterly a distance of
94.85 feet along the curve concave to the southwest, having a radius of 154.00 feet
and a central angle of 35°17'23"; thence South 47°29'22" East tangent to said
curve, a distance of 37.74 feet to the beginning of a curve tangent to said line;
thence southeasterly a distance of 28.64 feet along the curve concave to the
southwest, having a radius of 214.00 feet and a central angle of 7°40'02"; thence
South 39°49'21" East tangent to said curve, a distance of 159.54 feet to the
beginning of a curve tangent to said line; thence southeasterly and southerly a
distance of 100.05 feet along the curve concave to the southwest, having a radius
of 314.00 feet and a central angle of 18°15'22"; thence South 21°33'59" East
tangent to said curve, a distance of 126.81 feet to the beginning of a curve tangent
to said line; thence southerly and southeasterly a distance of 85.41 feet along the
curve concave to the northeast, having a radius of 386.00 feet and a central angle
of 12°40'38"; thence South 34°14'37" East tangent to said curve, a distance of
177.22 feet; thence North 55°45'23" East, a distance of 94.67 feet; thence South
38°40'29" East, a distance of 50.00 feet; thence South 28°31'17" West, a distance
of 168.37 feet; thence North 61°20'49" West, a distance of 50.00 feet to the
beginning of a curve radial to said line; thence northeasterly, northerly and
northwesterly a distance of 48.30 feet along the curve concave to the west, having
a radius of 44.00 feet and a central angle of 62°53'48"; thence North 34°14'37"

HCS HB 2336 7
West tangent to said curve, a distance of 220.45 feet to the beginning of a curve
tangent to said line; thence northwesterly and northerly a distance of 96.47 feet
along the curve concave to the northeast, having a radius of 436.00 feet and a
central angle of 12°40'38"; thence North 21°33'59" West tangent to said curve, a
distance of 126.81 feet to the beginning of a curve tangent to said line; thence
northerly and northwesterly a distance of 84.12 feet along the curve concave to
the southwest, having a radius of 264.00 feet and a central angle of 18°15'22";
thence North 39°49'21" West tangent to said curve, a distance of 159.54 feet to
the beginning of a curve tangent to said line; thence northwesterly a distance of
21.95 feet along the curve concave to the southwest, having a radius of 164.00 feet
and a central angle of 7°40'02"; thence North 47°29'22" West tangent to said
curve, a distance of 37.74 feet to the beginning of a curve tangent to said line;
thence northwesterly and westerly a distance of 64.06 feet along the curve
concave to the southwest, having a radius of 104.00 feet and a central angle of 35°
17'23"; thence North 82°46'45" West tangent to said curve, a distance of 56.40
feet; thence North 53°01'15" West, a distance of 36.34 feet; thence North 16°
26'26" East, a distance of 68.06 feet; thence North 70°37'31" East, a distance of
30.83 feet to the end of easement.
2. The commissioner of administration shall set the terms and conditions for the
conveyance as the commissioner deems reasonable. Such terms and conditions may
include, but not be limited to, the number of appraisals required and the time, place,
and terms of the conveyance.
3. The attorney general shall approve the form of the instrument of conveyance.
Section 6. 1. The governor is hereby authorized and empowered to sell, transfer,
grant, convey, remise, release, and forever quitclaim all interest of the state of Missouri
in property located in the City of Doniphan, Ripley County, Missouri, to the Doniphan
school district. The property to be conveyed is more particularly described as follows:
All of Lot Number Nine, in Block Number Three, in Cox's Addition to the City of
Doniphan, Missouri.
2. The commissioner of administration shall set the terms and conditions for the
sale, transfer, grant, conveyance, or release as the commissioner deems reasonable.
Such terms and conditions may include, but not be limited to, the number of appraisals
required and the time, place, and terms of the sale, transfer, grant, conveyance, or
release.
3. The attorney general shall approve the form of the instrument of conveyance.
Section 7. 1. The governor is hereby authorized and empowered to sell, transfer,
grant, convey, remise, release, and forever quitclaim all interest of the state of Missouri

HCS HB 2336 8
in property located in the City of Higginsville, Lafayette County, Missouri. The
property to be conveyed is more particularly described as follows:
Tract 1:
A tract of land in the Northwest ¼ of the Northwest ¼ of Section 12, Township 49
North of the Base line, Range 26, West of the Fifth Principal Meridian, in
Higginsville, Lafayette County, Missouri, described as follows: Beginning at a
point 529.00 feet West and 30.0 feet South of the Northeast corner of said
Northwest ¼ of Northwest ¼ of Section 12, Township 49 North, Range 26 West;
thence from the point of beginning West parallel to and 30.0 feet South of the
North line of said ¼ ¼ section 444.42 feet to a point; thence South 490.08 feet to a
point, thence East 444.42 feet to a point 400.00 feet West of the Westerly right of
way line of Missouri State Highway No. 13; thence North parallel with said 13
Highway right of way 490.08 feet to the point of beginning, containing 5 acres,
more or less, EXCEPT that part, if any, in roads, public or private.
Tract 2:
A tract of land located in the Northwest ¼ of the Northwest ¼ of Section 12,
Township 49 North of the Base line, Range 26 West of the Fifth Principal
Meridian, in Higginsville, Lafayette County, Missouri, described as follows:
Beginning at a point 529.00 feet West and 520.08 feet South from the Northeast
corner of said Northwest ¼ of Northwest ¼ of Section 12, Township 49 North,
Range 26, West; thence from the point of beginning 444.42 feet West to a point;
thence South 197 feet to a point; thence East 444.42 feet to a point; thence North
197 feet to the point of beginning.
2. The commissioner of administration shall set the terms and conditions for the
sale, transfer, grant, conveyance, or release as the commissioner deems reasonable.
Such terms and conditions may include, but not be limited to, the number of appraisals
required and the time, place, and terms of the sale, transfer, grant, conveyance, or
release.
3. The attorney general shall approve the form of the instrument of conveyance.
Section 8. 1. The governor is hereby authorized and empowered to sell, transfer,
grant, convey, remise, release, and forever quitclaim all interest of the state of Missouri
in property located in the City of Jefferson, Cole County, Missouri. The property to be
conveyed is more particularly described as follows:
PART OF THE WEST HALF OF THE SOUTHEAST QUARTER OF
SECTION 34, TOWNSHIP 45 NORTH, RANGE 12 WEST, IN THE CITY
OF JEFFERSON, COLE COUNTY, MISSOURI, MORE PARTICULARLY
DESCRIBED AS FOLLOWS:

HCS HB 2336 9
FROM THE NORTHEAST CORNER OF THE WEST HALF OF THE
SOUTHEAST QUARTER OF SAID SECTION 34; THENCE SOUTH 05
DEGREES 46 MINUTES 13 SECONDS EAST ALONG THE EAST LINE OF
THE WEST HALF OF THE SOUTHEAST QUARTER OF SAID SECTION 34
AND THE WEST LINE OF RIVERVIEW CEMETERY, 2222.85 FEET TO
THE POINT OF BEGINNING FOR THIS DESCRIPTION; THENCE
CONTINUING SOUTH 05 DEGREES 46 MINUTES 13 SECONDS EAST
ALONG SAID WEST LINE OF RIVERVIEW CEMETERY AND THE EAST
LINE OF THE WEST HALF OF THE SOUTHEAST QUARTER OF SECTION
34, 400.12 FEET TO THE NORTHERLY LINE OF WEST MAIN STREET;
THENCE WESTERLY ALONG THE NORTHERLY LINE OF SAID WEST
MAIN STREET, ON A CURVE TO THE LEFT, HAVING A RADIUS OF
1940.08 FEET, A DISTANCE OF 226.85 FEET; THENCE SOUTH 82
DEGREES 25 MINUTES 40 SECONDS WEST ALONG THE NORTH LINE
OF SAID WEST MAIN STREET, 73.40 FEET TO THE EAST LINE OF
HOOVER ROAD; THENCE NORTH 05 DEGREES 46 MINUTES 13
SECONDS WEST ALONG THE EAST LINE OF HOOVER ROAD, 396.31
FEET; THENCE LEAVING THE EAST LINE OF HOOVER ROAD, NORTH
84 DEGREES 13 MINUTES 47 SECONDS EAST, 300.00 FEET TO THE
POINT OF BEGINNING.
2. The commissioner of administration shall set the terms and conditions for the
sale, transfer, grant, conveyance, or release as the commissioner deems reasonable.
Such terms and conditions may include, but not be limited to, the number of appraisals
required and the time, place, and terms of the sale, transfer, grant, conveyance, or
release.
3. The attorney general shall approve the form of the instrument of conveyance.
Section 9. 1. The governor is hereby authorized and empowered to sell, transfer,
grant, convey, remise, release, and forever quitclaim all interest of the state of Missouri
in property located in the City of Richwoods, Washington County, Missouri. The
property to be conveyed is more particularly described as follows:
Tract #1: Part of the Northeast Quarter (NE1/4) of the Northwest Quarter
(NW1/4) of Section Fourteen (14), Township Thirty-nine (39) North, Range One
(1) East particularly described as follows:
Commencing at a pile of stones marking the Northwest corner of Section
Fourteen (14) Township Thirty-nine (39) North, Range One (1) East, thence
South 63 degrees 38 minutes East 1533.24 feet to an iron pin set in concrete for
the Northwest corner of the herein conveyed tract or parcel and the true point of

HCS HB 2336 10
beginning; thence from said true point of beginning North 70 degrees East, at
125.00 feet pass an iron pin set in concrete a total distance of 250.00 feet to an
iron pin set in concrete for the Northeast corner; thence South 20 degrees East, at
328.9 feet pass an iron pin set in concrete on the North boundary of Missouri
State Farm to Market Road "T" a total distance of 359.7 feet to a point on the
centerline of said road for the Southeast corner; thence South 64 degrees 40
minutes West 0.75 feet along the centerline of said road to a point marking the
P.C. of a curve; thence on a curve to the left along said centerline whose interior
angle is 39 degrees 03 minutes and whose radius is 410.28 feet and whose tangent
bearing is South 64 degrees 40 minutes West for a distance of 279.62 feet to a
point for the Southwest corner; thence North 20 degrees West, at 53.81 feet pass
an iron pin set in concrete, a total distance of 474.41 feet to the point of
beginning, containing 2.07 acres, more or less, exclusive of that portion lying
within the public road. All bearings recited herein are based on True North as
determined by Solar Observation.
2. The commissioner of administration shall set the terms and conditions for the
sale, transfer, grant, conveyance, or release as the commissioner deems reasonable.
Such terms and conditions may include, but not be limited to, the number of appraisals
required and the time, place, and terms of the sale, transfer, grant, conveyance, or
release.
3. The attorney general shall approve the form of the instrument of conveyance.
Section 10. 1. The governor is hereby authorized and empowered to sell,
transfer, grant, convey, remise, release, and forever quitclaim all interest of the state of
Missouri in property located in Jackson County, Missouri. The property to be conveyed
is more particularly described as follows:
All that part of the Southwest Quarter (SW ¼) of Section 18, Township 48, Range
31, in Lee's Summit, Jackson County, Missouri, described as follows: Beginning
at a point on the North line of said quarter-section 434.94 feet East of the
Northwest corner thereof; thence East along said North line 601.83 feet; then
South, at right angles from the last described course 601.83 feet, thence West, at
right angles from the last described course 601.83 feet; thence North, at right
angles from the last described course 601.83 feet to the point of beginning;
containing 362,199 square feet, or approximately 8.315 acres.
2. The commissioner of administration shall set the terms and conditions for the
sale, transfer, grant, conveyance, or release as the commissioner deems reasonable.
Such terms and conditions may include, but not be limited to, the number of appraisals

HCS HB 2336 11
required and the time, place, and terms of the sale, transfer, grant, conveyance, or
release.
3. The attorney general shall approve the form of the instrument of conveyance.
Section 11. 1. The governor is hereby authorized and empowered to sell,
transfer, grant, convey, remise, release, and forever quitclaim all interest of the state of
Missouri in property located in Cole County, Missouri, to the City of Jefferson. The
property to be conveyed is more particularly described as follows:
TRACT DESCRIPTION:
A TRACT OF LAND BEING PART OF INLOT 297, AND INLOT 301, CITY
OF JEFFERSON, COLE COUNTY, MISSOURI, BEING PART OF THE
TRACT DESCRIBED BY THE DEED IN BOOK 277 PAGE 341 OF THE
COLE COUNTY RECORDS, BEING MORE PARTICULARLY DESCRIBED
AS FOLLOWS:
COMMENCING AT THE NORTHWEST CORNER OF INLOT 297 OF THE
CITY OF JEFFERSON, ALSO BEING THE NORTHWEST CORNER OF THE
TRACT DESCRIBED BY THE DEED IN BOOK 277 PAGE 341 OF THE
COLE COUNTY RECORDS, THENCE WITH THE NORTHWEST LINE OF
SAID INLOT 297 AND THE NORTHWEST LINE OF SAID TRACT, N 42°
14'53" E, 154.53 FEET, TO THE POINT OF BEGINNING
THENCE FROM THE POINT OF BEGINNING, LEAVING THE
NORTHWEST LINE OF INLOT 297, AND THE NORTHWEST LINE OF
SAID TRACT, S 47°50'05" E, 19.74 FEET; THENCE S 42°09'56" W, 158.35
FEET; THENCE S 48°23'10" E, 72.95 FEET; THENCE S 41°36'50" W, 98.71
FEET, TO A POINT ON THE SOUTHWEST LINE OF THE TRACT
DESCRIBED BY THE DEED IN BOOK 277 PAGE 341 OF THE COLE
COUNTY RECORDS; THENCE WITH THE SOUTHWEST LINE OF SAID
TRACT THE FOLLOWING COURSES: N 48°09'32" W, 78.99 FEET;
THENCE N 42°24'31" E, 32.97 FEET; THENCE N 64°34'23" W, 15.78 FEET,
TO A POINT ON THE NORTHWEST LINE OF INLOT 301, ALSO BEING A
POINT ON THE NORTHWEST LINE OF THE TRACT DESCRIBED BY THE
DEED IN BOOK 277 PAGE 341 OF THE COLE COUNTY RECORDS;
THENCE WITH THE NORTHWEST LINE OF SAID INLOT 301 AND INLOT
297, ALSO BEING THE NORTHWEST LINE OF SAID TRACT, S 42°14'53"
E, 228.38 FEET TO THE POINT OF BEGINNING AND CONTAINS 0.27
ACRES MORE OR LESS.
TEMPORARY CONSTRUCTION EASEMENT:

HCS HB 2336 12
A TRACT BEING PART OF INLOT 297, INLOT 301, INLOT 302, AND INLOT
303 CITY OF JEFFERSON, COLE COUNTY, MISSOURI, BEING PART OF
THE TRACT DESCRIBED BY THE DEED IN BOOK 277 PAGE 341 OF THE
COLE COUNTY RECORDS, BEING MORE PARTICULARLY DESCRIBED
AS FOLLOWS:
BEGINNING AT THE NORTHWEST CORNER OF INLOT 297 OF THE
CITY OF JEFFERSON, ALSO BEING THE NORTHWEST CORNER OF THE
TRACT DESCRIBED BY THE DEED IN BOOK 277 PAGE 341 OF THE
COLE COUNTY RECORDS, THENCE WITH THE NORTHEAST LINE OF
SAID INLOT 297 AND THE NORTHEAST LINE OF SAID TRACT, S 48°
09'25" E, 79.52 FEET; THENCE LEAVING THE NORTHEAST LINE OF
INLOT 297, AND THE NORTHEAST LINE OF SAID TRACT, S 42°09'56" W,
275.23 FEET; THENCE S 48°23'09" E, 49.69 FEET; THENCE S 09°39'05" W,
150.87 FEET; THENCE S 41°36'50" W, 8.27 FEET, TO A POINT ON THE
SOUTH LINE OF THE TRACT DESCRIBED BY THE DEED IN BOOK 277
PAGE 341 OF THE COLE COUNTY RECORDS; THENCE WITH THE
SOUTH LINE OF SAID TRACT, N 48°38'41" W, 32.24 FEET; THENCE N 48°
09'32" W, 84.73 FEET; THENCE LEAVING THE SOUTH LINE OF SAID
TRACT, N 41°36'50" E, 98.71 FEET; THENCE N 48°23'10" W, 72.95 FEET;
THENCE N 42°09'56" E, 158.35 FEET; THENCE N 47°50'05" W, 19.74 FEET,
TO A POINT ON THE NORTHWEST LINE OF INLOT 297, ALSO BEING A
POINT ON THE NORTHWEST LINE OF THE TRACT DESCRIBED BY THE
DEED IN BOOK 277 PAGE 341 OF THE COLE COUNTY RECORDS;
THENCE WITH THE NORTHWEST LINE OF INLOT 297, AND THE
NORTHWEST LINE OF SAID TRACT, N 42°14'53" E, 154.38 FEET TO THE
POINT OF BEGINNING AND CONTAINS 0.76 ACRE MORE OR LESS.
TRACT DESCRIPTION:
A TRACT OF LAND BEING PART OF INLOTS 431 AND 435, CITY OF
JEFFERSON, COLE COUNTY, MISSOURI, BEING PART OF THE TRACT
DESCRIBED BY THE DEED IN BOOK 277 PAGE 342 OF THE COLE
COUNTY RECORDS, BEING MORE PARTICULARLY DESCRIBED AS
FOLLOWS:
BEGINNING AT THE NORTHEAST CORNER OF INLOT 431 OF THE CITY
OF JEFFERSON, ALSO BEING THE NORTHEAST CORNER OF THE
TRACT DESCRIBED BY THE DEED IN BOOK 277 PAGE 342 OF THE
COLE COUNTY RECORDS, THENCE WITH THE SOUTHEAST LINE OF
SAID INLOT 431 AND INLOT 435, ALSO BEING THE SOUTHEAST LINE

HCS HB 2336 13
OF SAID TRACT, S 42°08'00" W, 417.44 FEET TO THE SOUTHEAST
CORNER OF INLOT 435, ALSO BEING THE SOUTHEAST CORNER OF
SAID TRACT; THENCE WITH THE SOUTHWEST LINE OF INLOT 435,
AND WITH THE SOUTHWEST LINE OF SAID TRACT, N 47°42'52" W, 28.00
FEET; THENCE LEAVING THE SOUTHWEST LINE OF SAID INLOT 435
AND SAID TRACT, N 41°53'46" E, 356.78 FEET; THENCE N 21°00'20" E,
44.38 FEET; THENCE N 18°15'25" W, 39.27 FEET TO A POINT ON THE
NORTHEAST LINE OF INLOT 431, ALSO BEING A POINT ON THE
NORTHEAST LINE OF THE TRACT DESCRIBED BY THE DEED IN BOOK
277 PAGE 342 OF THE COLE COUNTY RECORDS; THENCE WITH THE
NORTHEAST LINE OF SAID INLOT 431 AND THE NORTHEAST LINE OF
SAID TRACT, S 47°42'52" E, 79.61 FEET TO THE POINT OF BEGINNING
AND CONTAINS 0.30 ACRES MORE OR LESS.
TEMPORARY CONSTRUCTION EASEMENT:
A TRACT BEING PART OF INLOTS 428 THRU 431 AND INLOT 435, CITY
OF JEFFERSON, COLE COUNTY, MISSOURI, BEING PART OF THE
TRACT DESCRIBED BY THE DEED IN BOOK 277 PAGE 342 OF THE
COLE COUNTY RECORDS, BEING MORE PARTICULARLY DESCRIBED
AS FOLLOWS:
COMMENCING AT THE NORTHEAST CORNER OF INLOT 431 OF THE
CITY OF JEFFERSON, ALSO BEING THE NORTHEAST CORNER OF THE
TRACT DESCRIBED BY THE DEED IN BOOK 277 PAGE 342 OF THE
COLE COUNTY RECORDS, THENCE WITH THE NORTHEAST LINE OF
SAID INLOT 431 AND THE NORTHEAST LINE OF SAID TRACT, N 47°
42'52" W, 79.61 FEET, TO THE POINT OF BEGINNING:
THENCE FROM THE POINT OF BEGINNING, LEAVING THE
NORTHEAST LINE OF INLOT 431, AND THE NORTHEAST LINE OF
SAID TRACT, S 18°15'25" E, 39.27 FEET; THENCE S 21°00'20" W, 44.38
FEET; THENCE S 41°53'46" W, 356.78 FEET, TO A POINT ON THE
100 SOUTHWEST LINE OF INLOT 435, ALSO BEING A POINT ON THE
101 SOUTHWEST LINE OF THE TRACT DESCRIBED BY THE DEED IN BOOK
102 277 PAGE 342 OF THE COLE COUNTY RECORDS; THENCE N 47°42'52" E,
103 38.00 FEET, WITH THE SOUTHWEST LINE OF INLOT 435, ALSO BEING
104 THE SOUTHWEST LINE OF SAID TRACT; THENCE LEAVING THE
105 SOUTHWEST LINE OF INLOT 435, ALSO BEING THE SOUTHWEST LINE
106 OF SAID TRACT DESCRIBED BY THE DEED IN BOOK 277 PAGE 342 OF
107 THE COLE COUNTY RECORDS, N 42°09'55" E, 320.16 FEET; THENCE N

HCS HB 2336 14
108 03°49'48" W, 97.35 FEET; THENCE N 48°11'21" W, 120.57 FEET; THENCE N
109 88°09'33" W, 223.89 TO A POINT ON THE NORTHWEST LINE OF INLOT
110 428, ALSO BEING A POINT ON THE NORTHWEST LINE OF THE TRACT
111 DESCRIBED BY THE DEED IN BOOK 277 PAGE 342 OF THE COLE
112 COUNTY RECORDS; THENCE WITH THE NORTHWEST LINE OF SAID
113 INLOT 428, ALSO BEING THE NORTHWEST LINE OF SAID TRACT, N 42°
114 05'08" E, 167.29 FEET TO THE NORTHWEST CORNER OF SAID INLOT
115 428 AND THE NORTHWEST CORNER OF SAID TRACT; THENCE WITH
116 THE NORTHEAST LINE OF SAID INLOT 428, 429, 430 AND 431, ALSO
117 BEING THE NORTHEAST LINE OF SAID TRACT, S 47°42'52" E, 338.04
118 FEET, TO THE POINT OF BEGINNING AND CONTAINS 0.86 ACRE MORE
119 OR LESS.
120 TRACT DESCRIPTION:
121 A TRACT OF LAND BEING PART OF INLOTS 436 AND 437, CITY OF
122 JEFFERSON, COLE COUNTY, MISSOURI, BEING PART OF THE TRACT
123 DESCRIBED BY THE DEED IN BOOK 277 PAGE 339 OF THE COLE
124 COUNTY RECORDS, BEING MORE PARTICULARLY DESCRIBED AS
125 FOLLOWS:
126 COMMENCING AT THE NORTHWEST CORNER OF INLOT 436 OF THE
127 CITY OF JEFFERSON, ALSO BEING THE NORTHWEST CORNER OF
128 TRACT 2.70 AS DESCRIBED BY THE DEED IN BOOK 121 PAGE 353 OF
129 THE COLE COUNTY RECORDS, THENCE WITH THE NORTHWEST LINE
130 OF SAID INLOT 436 AND THE NORTHWEST LINE OF SAID TRACT 2.70, S
131 42°08'00" W, 12.68 FEET TO THE SOUTHWEST CORNER OF SAID TRACT
132 2.70, THE POINT OF BEGINNING:
133 THENCE FROM THE POINT OF BEGINNING, LEAVING THE
134 NORTHWEST LINE OF INLOT 436, AND WITH THE SOUTHWEST LINE
135 OF TRACT 2.70 AS DESCRIBED BY THE DEED IN BOOK 121 PAGE 353 OF
136 THE COLE COUNTY RECORDS, WITH A CURVE TO THE RIGHT 2.31
137 FEET, CURVE RADIUS 13.83 FEET, CHORD S 53°30'25" E, 2.31 FEET;
138 THENCE S 48°42'49" E, 103.75 FEET TO THE SOUTHEAST CORNER OF
139 SAID TRACT 2.70, ALSO BEING THE SOUTHWEST CORNER OF THE
140 TRACT DESCRIBED BY THE DEED IN BOOK 123 PAGE 284 OF THE
141 COLE COUNTY RECORDS; THENCE WITH THE SOUTHWEST LINE OF
142 SAID TRACT, S 59°09'35" E, 17.29 FEET; THENCE S 48°39'20" E, 33.54 FEET
143 TO THE SOUTHEAST CORNER OF SAID TRACT, ALSO BEING THE
144 SOUTHWEST CORNER OF TRACT 2.60 AS DESCRIBED BY THE DEED IN

HCS HB 2336 15
145 BOOK 121 PAGE 353; THENCE WITH THE SOUTHWEST LINE OF SAID
146 TRACT S 48°41'47" E, 41.38 FEET; THENCE LEAVING THE SOUTHWEST
147 LINE OF SAID TRACT, S 41°38'16" W, 10.46 FEET; THENCE N 48°04'58" W,
148 70.28 FEET; THENCE WITH A CURVE TO THE LEFT 99.14 FEET, CURVE
149 RADIUS 89.00 FEET, CHORD N 79°59'40" W, 94.09 FEET; THENCE S 68°
150 05'37" W, 58.04 FEET; THENCE N 21°54'23" W, 4.43 FEET; THENCE S 68°
151 05'37" W, 42.59 FEET TO A POINT ON THE NORTHWEST LINE OF INLOT
152 436, ALSO BEING A POINT ON THE NORTHWEST LINE OF THE TRACT
153 DESCRIBED BY THE DEED IN BOOK 277 PAGE 339 OF THE COLE
154 COUNTY RECORDS; THENCE WITH THE NORTHWEST LINE OF SAID
155 INLOT 436 AND THE NORTHWEST LINE OF SAID TRACT, N 42°08'00" E,
156 143.09 FEET TO THE POINT OF BEGINNING AND CONTAINS 0.16 ACRES
157 MORE OR LESS.
158 TEMPORARY CONSTRUCTION EASEMENT:
159 A TRACT BEING PART OF INLOTS 436 THRU 440, CITY OF JEFFERSON,
160 COLE COUNTY, MISSOURI, BEING PART OF THE TRACT DESCRIBED
161 BY THE DEED IN BOOK 277 PAGE 339 OF THE COLE COUNTY
162 RECORDS, BEING MORE PARTICULARLY DESCRIBED AS FOLLOWS:
163 COMMENCING AT THE NORTHWEST CORNER OF INLOT 436 OF THE
164 CITY OF JEFFERSON, ALSO BEING THE NORTHWEST CORNER OF
165 TRACT 2.70 AS DESCRIBED BY THE DEED IN BOOK 121 PAGE 353 OF
166 THE COLE COUNTY RECORDS, THENCE WITH THE NORTHWEST LINE
167 OF SAID INLOT 436 AND THE NORTHWEST LINE OF SAID TRACT 2.70, S
168 42°08'00" W, 12.68 FEET TO THE SOUTHWEST CORNER OF SAID TRACT
169 2.70; THENCE CONTINUING WITH THE NORTHWEST LINE OF SAID
170 INLOT 436, S 42°08'00" W, 143.09 FEET, TO THE POINT OF BEGINNING:
171 THENCE FROM THE POINT OF BEGINNING, LEAVING THE
172 NORTHWEST LINE OF INLOT 436, N 68°05'37" E, 42.59 FEET; THENCE
173 S 21°54'23" W, 4.43 FEET; THENCE N 68°05'37" E, 58.04 FEET; THENCE
174 WITH A CURVE TO THE RIGHT 99.14 FEET, CURVE RADIUS 89.00 FEET,
175 CHORD N 79°59'40" E, 94.09 FEET; THENCE S 48°04'58" E, 70.28 FEET;
176 THENCE N 41°38'16" E, 10.46 FEET TO A POINT ON THE SOUTHWEST
177 LINE OF TRACT 2.60 AS DESCRIBED BY THE DEED IN BOOK 121 PAGE
178 353 OF THE COLE COUNTY RECORDS; THENCE WITH THE
179 SOUTHWEST LINE OF TRACTS 2.60, 2.50, 2.40, AND 2.30 AS
180 DESCRIBED BY THE DEED IN BOOK 121 PAGE 353 OF THE COLE
181 COUNTY RECORDS, S 48°41'51" E, 135.07 FEET; THENCE S 53°55'14" E,

HCS HB 2336 16
182 61.87 FEET, TO A POINT ON THE NORTHEAST LINE OF INLOT OF 439,
183 ALSO BEING THE NORTHEAST CORNER OF TRACT 2.30 AS DESCRIBED
184 BY THE DEED IN BOOK 121 PAGE 353 OF THE COLE COUNTY
185 RECORDS; THENCE WITH THE NORTHEAST LINE OF INLOT 439, S
186 48°09'18" E, 22.95 TO THE NORTHEAST CORNER OF SAID INLOT 439;
187 THENCE WITH THE SOUTHEAST LINE OF SAID INLOT 439, S 42°08'00"
188 W, 49.40 FEET; THENCE LEAVING THE SOUTHEAST LINE OF SAID
189 INLOT 439, N 48°21'44" W, 277.24 FEET; THENCE S 86°54'06" W, 142.07
190 FEET; THENCE S 42°09'55" W, 266.70 FEET, TO A POINT ON THE
191 SOUTHWEST LINE OF INLOT 440; THENCE WITH THE SOUTHWEST
192 LINE OF INLOT 440, N 48°09'32" W, 40.00 TO THE SOUTHWEST CORNER
193 OF SAID INLOT 440; THENCE WITH THE NORTHWEST LINE OF SAID
194 INLOT 440, N 42°08'00" E, 261.67 FEET TO THE POINT OF BEGINNING
195 AND CONTAINS 0.70 ACRE MORE OR LESS.
196 TRACT DESCRIPTION:
197 A TRACT OF LAND BEING PART OF INLOTS 295 AND 296, CITY OF
198 JEFFERSON, COLE COUNTY, MISSOURI, BEING PART OF THE TRACT
199 DESCRIBED BY THE DEED IN BOOK 277 PAGE 340 OF THE COLE
200 COUNTY RECORDS, BEING MORE PARTICULARLY DESCRIBED AS
201 FOLLOWS:
202 BEGINNING AT THE SOUTHEAST CORNER OF INLOT 296 OF THE CITY
203 OF JEFFERSON, ALSO BEING THE SOUTHEAST CORNER OF THE
204 TRACT DESCRIBED BY THE DEED IN BOOK 277 PAGE 340 OF THE
205 COLE COUNTY RECORDS, THENCE WITH THE SOUTHWEST LINE OF
206 SAID INLOT 295 AND INLOT 296, ALSO BEING THE SOUTHWEST LINE
207 OF SAID TRACT, N 47°42'52" W, 208.34 FEET TO THE SOUTHWEST
208 CORNER OF INLOT 295, ALSO BEING THE SOUTHWEST CORNER OF
209 SAID TRACT; THENCE WITH THE NORTHWEST LINE OF INLOT 295,
210 AND WITH THE NORTHWEST LINE OF SAID TRACT, N 42°05'08" E, 56.27
211 FEET; THENCE LEAVING THE NORTHWEST LINE OF SAID INLOT 295
212 AND SAID TRACT, S 48°11'21" E, 149.10 FEET; THENCE S 57°43'36" E, 60.32
213 FEET, TO A POINT ON THE SOUTHEAST LINE OF INLOT 296, ALSO
214 BEING A POINT ON THE SOUTHEAST LINE OF THE TRACT DESCRIBED
215 BY THE DEED IN BOOK 277 PAGE 340 OF THE COLE COUNTY
216 RECORDS; THENCE WITH THE SOUTHEAST LINE OF SAID INLOT 296
217 AND THE SOUTHEAST LINE OF SAID TRACT, S 42°14'53" W, 68.00 FEET

HCS HB 2336 17
218 TO THE POINT OF BEGINNING AND CONTAINS 0.28 ACRES MORE OR
219 LESS.
220 TEMPORARY CONSTRUCTION EASEMENT:
221 A TRACT BEING PART OF INLOTS 292, INLOT 295 AND INLOT 296, CITY
222 OF JEFFERSON, COLE COUNTY, MISSOURI, BEING PART OF THE
223 TRACT DESCRIBED BY THE DEED IN BOOK 277 PAGE 340 OF THE
224 COLE COUNTY RECORDS, BEING MORE PARTICULARLY DESCRIBED
225 AS FOLLOWS:
226 COMMENCING AT THE SOUTHEAST CORNER OF INLOT 296 OF THE
227 CITY OF JEFFERSON, ALSO BEING THE SOUTHEAST CORNER OF THE
228 TRACT DESCRIBED BY THE DEED IN BOOK 277 PAGE 340 OF THE
229 COLE COUNTY RECORDS, THENCE WITH THE SOUTHEAST LINE OF
230 SAID INLOT 296 AND THE SOUTHEAST LINE OF SAID TRACT, N 42°
231 14'53" E, 68.00 FEET, TO THE POINT OF BEGINNING:
232 THENCE FROM THE POINT OF BEGINNING, LEAVING THE
233 SOUTHEAST LINE OF INLOT 296, AND THE SOUTHEAST LINE OF
234 SAID TRACT, N 57°43'36" W, 60.32 FEET; THENCE N 48°11'21" W, 149.10
235 FEET, TO A POINT ON THE NORTHWEST LINE OF INLOT 295, ALSO
236 BEING A POINT ON THE NORTHWEST LINE OF SAID TRACT; THENCE
237 WITH THE NORTHWEST LINE OF INLOT 295 AND THE NORTHWEST
238 LINE OF SAID TRACT, N 42°05'08" E, 70.01 FEET; THENCE LEAVING THE
239 NORTHWEST LINE OF INLOT 295 AND THE NORTHWEST LINE OF SAID
240 TRACT, S 48°11'45" E, 153.64 FEET; THENCE N 42°09'56" E, 290.35 FEET,
241 TO A POINT ON THE NORTHEAST LINE OF INLOT 292, ALSO BEING A
242 POINT ON THE NORTHEAST LINE OF SAID TRACT; THENCE WITH
243 THE NORTHEAST LINE OF INLOT 292 AND THE NORTHEAST LINE OF
244 SAID TRACT, S 47°47'48" E, 55.48 FEET, TO THE NORTHEAST CORNER
245 OF INLOT 292, ALSO BEING THE NORTHEAST CORNER OF SAID
246 TRACT; THENCE WITH THE SOUTHEAST LINE OF SAID INLOT 292,
247 AND INLOT 296, ALSO BEING THE SOUTHEAST LINE OF SAID TRACT, S
248 42°14'41" W, 349.75 FEET, TO THE POINT OF BEGINNING AND
249 CONTAINS 0.70 ACRE MORE OR LESS.
250 TRACT DESCRIPTION:
251 A TRACT OF LAND BEING PART OF INLOTS 293 AND 294, CITY OF
252 JEFFERSON, COLE COUNTY, MISSOURI, BEING PART OF THE TRACT
253 DESCRIBED BY THE DEED IN BOOK 329 PAGE 358 OF THE COLE

HCS HB 2336 18
254 COUNTY RECORDS, BEING MORE PARTICULARLY DESCRIBED AS
255 FOLLOWS:
256 BEGINNING AT THE SOUTHEAST CORNER OF INLOT 294 OF THE CITY
257 OF JEFFERSON, ALSO BEING THE SOUTHEAST CORNER OF THE
258 TRACT DESCRIBED BY THE DEED IN BOOK 329 PAGE 358 OF THE
259 COLE COUNTY RECORDS, THENCE WITH THE SOUTHWEST LINE OF
260 SAID INLOT 294 AND INLOT 293, ALSO BEING THE SOUTHWEST LINE
261 OF SAID TRACT, N 47°42'52" W, 183.54 FEET TO THE INTERSECTION OF
262 THE SOUTHWEST LINE OF INLOTS 293 AND THE SOUTHEAST RIGHT
263 OF WAY LINE OF THE MISSOURI PACIFIC RAILROAD; THENCE WITH
264 THE SOUTHEAST RIGHT OF WAY LINE OF THE MISSOURI PACIFIC
265 RAILROAD, N 73°49'28" E, 64.57 FEET; THENCE LEAVING THE
266 SOUTHEAST RIGHT OF WAY LINE OF THE MISSOURI PACIFIC
267 RAILROAD, S 48°11'21" E, 149.57 FEET, TO A POINT ON THE
268 SOUTHEAST LINE OF INLOT 294, ALSO BEING A POINT ON THE
269 SOUTHEAST LINE OF THE TRACT DESCRIBED BY THE DEED IN BOOK
270 329 PAGE 358 OF THE COLE COUNTY RECORDS; THENCE WITH THE
271 SOUTHEAST LINE OF SAID INLOT 294 AND THE SOUTHEAST LINE OF
272 SAID TRACT, S 42°05'08" W, 56.27 FEET TO THE POINT OF BEGINNING
273 AND CONTAINS 0.21 ACRES MORE OR LESS.
274 TEMPORARY CONSTRUCTION EASEMENT:
275 A TRACT OF LAND BEING PART OF INLOTS 293 AND 294, CITY OF
276 JEFFERSON, COLE COUNTY, MISSOURI, BEING PART OF THE TRACT
277 DESCRIBED BY THE DEED IN BOOK 329 PAGE 358 OF THE COLE
278 COUNTY RECORDS, BEING MORE PARTICULARLY DESCRIBED AS
279 FOLLOWS:
280 COMMENCING AT THE SOUTHEAST CORNER OF INLOT 294 OF THE
281 CITY OF JEFFERSON, ALSO BEING THE SOUTHEAST CORNER OF THE
282 TRACT DESCRIBED BY THE DEED IN BOOK 277 PAGE 340 OF THE
283 COLE COUNTY RECORDS, THENCE WITH THE SOUTHEAST LINE OF
284 SAID INLOT 294 AND THE SOUTHEAST LINE OF SAID TRACT, N 42°
285 05'08" E, 56.27 FEET, TO THE POINT OF BEGINNING:
286 THENCE FROM THE POINT OF BEGINNING, LEAVING THE
287 SOUTHEAST LINE OF INLOT 294, AND THE SOUTHEAST LINE OF
288 SAID TRACT, N 48°11'21" W, 149.57 FEET, TO A POINT ON THE
289 SOUTHEAST RIGHT OF WAY LINE OF THE MISSOURI PACIFIC
290 RAILROAD; THENCE WITH THE SOUTHEAST RIGHT OF WAY LINE

HCS HB 2336 19
291 OF THE MISSOURI PACIFIC RAILROAD, N 73°49'28" E, 82.56 FEET;
292 THENCE LEAVING THE SOUTHEAST RIGHT OF WAY LINE OF THE
293 MISSOURI PACIFIC RAILROAD, S 48°11'45" E, 106.14 FEET, TO A POINT
294 ON THE SOUTHEAST LINE OF INLOT 294, ALSO BEING A POINT ON
295 THE SOUTHEAST LINE OF SAID TRACT; THENCE WITH THE
296 SOUTHEAST LINE OF INLOT 294 AND THE SOUTHEAST LINE OF
297 SAID TRACT, S 42°05'08" W, 70.01 FEET, TO THE POINT OF BEGINNING
298 AND CONTAINS 0.21 ACRE MORE OR LESS.
299 2. The commissioner of administration shall set the terms and conditions for the
300 conveyance as the commissioner deems reasonable. Such terms and conditions may
301 include, but not be limited to, the number of appraisals required and the time, place,
302 and terms of the conveyance.
303 3. The attorney general shall approve the form of the instrument of conveyance.
Section 12. 1. The governor is hereby authorized and empowered to sell,
transfer, grant, convey, remise, release, and forever quitclaim all interest of the state of
Missouri in property located in Nodaway County, Missouri. The property to be
conveyed is more particularly described as follows:
Tract 1
Beginning at the North Quarter Corner Section 13, Township 64 North, Range 36
West, Nodaway County, Missouri; thence along Section Line, South 86 degrees
48 minutes 14 seconds East 1557.37 feet; thence departing said line, South 03
degrees 05 minutes 47 seconds West 1037.56 feet; thence South 59 degrees 30
minutes 04 seconds East 503.01 feet; thence South 18 degrees 22 minutes 57
seconds West 282.59 feet; thence along the northern right-of-way of the former
Norfolk & Western Railroad the following courses and distances: South 89
degrees 57 minutes 27 seconds West 229.70 feet; thence 532.26 feet by arc
distance along a curve to the right having a radius of 3224.02 feet and a chord
bearing of North 85 degrees 20 minutes 37 seconds West 531.66 feet; thence
North 80 degrees 35 minutes 32 seconds West 1145.21 feet; thence departing said
right-of-way and along Quarter Section Line, North 01 degrees 52 minutes 08
seconds East 1416.90 feet to the point beginning.
Tract 2
Commencing at the North Quarter Corner Section 13, Township 64 North,
Range 36 West, Nodaway County, Missouri; thence along Quarter Section Line,
South 01 degrees 52 minutes 08 seconds West 1416.90 feet to the Point of
Beginning; thence continuing along Quarter Section Line, South 01 degrees 52
minutes 08 seconds West 50.44 feet; thence along the centerline of the former

HCS HB 2336 20
Norfolk & Western Railroad the following courses and distances: South 80
degrees 35 minutes 32 seconds East 1138.61 feet; thence 540.49 feet by arc
distance along a curve to the left having a radius of 3274.02 feet and a chord
bearing of South 85 degrees 20 minutes 36 seconds East 539.87 feet; thence North
89 degrees 57 minutes 27 seconds East 213.04 feet; thence departing said
centerline, North 18 degrees 22 minutes 57 seconds East 52.70 feet; thence along
the northern right-of-way of the former Norfolk & Western Railroad the
following courses and distances: South 89 degrees 57 minutes 27 seconds West
229.70 feet; thence 532.26 feet by arc distance along a curve to the right having a
radius of 3224.02 feet and a chord bearing of North 85 degrees 20 minutes 37
seconds West 531.66 feet; thence North 80 degrees 35 minutes 32 seconds West
1145.21 feet; to the point of beginning.
2. The commissioner of administration shall set the terms and conditions for the
conveyance as the commissioner deems reasonable. Such terms and conditions may
include, but not be limited to, the number of appraisals required and the time, place,
and terms of the conveyance.
3. The attorney general shall approve the form of the instrument of conveyance.
Section 13. 1. The governor is hereby authorized and empowered to sell,
transfer, grant, convey, remise, release, and forever quitclaim all interest of the state of
Missouri in property located in the city of Marshall, Saline County, Missouri. The
property to be conveyed is more particularly described as follows:
A tract of land located in the Northwest Quarter (NW ¼) of the Northwest
Quarter (NW ¼) of Section 10, Township 50 north of the base line, range 21 west
of the 5th Principal Meridan, Saline County, Missouri, more particularly
described as:
Beginning at an iron rod on the Westerly right-of-way line of State Highway #41;
said iron rod being S01°33’10”W 1247.92 feet, thence N89°30’21”W 174.60 feet
from the Northeast corner of the Northwest Quarter (NW ¼) of the Northwest
Quarter (NW ¼) of said Section 10; said iron rod also being the Northeast corner
of a 20.0 acres tract surveyed on October 1, 1983 by Robert Robinson and
recorded in Surveyor’s Book “W”, Page 57;
Thence N89°30’20”W following the North Line of said 20.0 acre tract a distance
of 541.08 feet to an iron rod;
Thence N09°41’55”W a distance of 592.48 feet to an iron rod;
Thence S89°30’20”E a distance of 504.67 feet to an iron rod at the intersection
with the Westerly right-of-way of State Highway #41;

HCS HB 2336 21
Thence S13°07’22”E following said Westerly right-of-way line a distance of
600.00 feet to point of beginning.
Tract contains 7.00 acres more or less.
2. The commissioner of administration shall set the terms and conditions for the
conveyance as the commissioner deems reasonable. Such terms and conditions may
include, but not be limited to, the number of appraisals required and the time, place,
and terms of the conveyance.
3. The attorney general shall approve the form of the instrument of conveyance.
Section 14. 1. The governor is hereby authorized and empowered to sell,
transfer, grant, convey, remise, release, and forever quitclaim all interest of the state of
Missouri in property located in the city of Bowling Green, Pike County, Missouri. The
property to be conveyed is more particularly described as follows:
All of a rectangular tract of land in part of the North Quarter of the Southwest
Quarter of the Southwest Quarter (N ¼ SW ¼ SW ¼) and part of the South one-
half of the North one-half of the Southwest Quarter of the Southwest Quarter (S
½ N ½ SW ¼ SW ¼) all in Section 25, Township 53 North, Range 3 West, Pike
County, Missouri, described as follows, to-wit:
Beginning at an iron pipe marking the Northwest corner of above-mentioned
southwest quarter of the southwest quarter (SW ¼ SW ¼) said Section 25;
Thence North 89 degrees and 51 minutes East on North line said Quarter-
Quarter ( ¼ ¼) Section and the South right of way U.S. Highway No. 61, 140 feet;
thence on said south right of way on the Arc of a Four (4) Degree curve to the
left, to a point south 82 degrees and 13 minutes, East on a cord distance of 361.15
feet to a point on said south right of way 50 feet south of centerline said highway,
and it being the P. T. of said curve; thence South 89 degrees and 58 minutes East
97.9 feet to a point on said south right of way, 50 feet south of centerline highway;
thence following said right of way south 73 degrees and 23 minutes East 104.57
feet to a point on said south right of way, 80 feet south of centerline thereof;
thence on along said right-of-way North 89 degrees and 52 minutes East 230.32
feet to an iron truck axle, 80 feet south of centerline highway; thence South 00
degrees and 30 minutes East 365.28 feet to an iron truck axle for the point of
beginning; run thence north along and with the East boundary line between the
County of Pike Ruth Jensen Village tract and the Claude and Cora Lee Shaon
tract a distance of 240’ to a point in the said boundary line; run thence West 120’
to a point; run thence South on a line parallel with the aforesaid East boundary
line 240’ to a point run thence East 120’ to the point of beginning.

HCS HB 2336 22
2. The commissioner of administration shall set the terms and conditions for the
conveyance as the commissioner deems reasonable. Such terms and conditions may
include, but not be limited to, the number of appraisals required and the time, place,
and terms of the conveyance.
3. The attorney general shall approve the form of the instrument of conveyance.
Section 15. 1. The governor is hereby authorized and empowered to sell,
transfer, grant, convey, remise, release, and forever quitclaim all interest of the state of
Missouri in property located in the city of Joplin, Jasper County, Missouri. The
property to be conveyed is more particularly described as follows:
Beginning at the Northwest Corner of said Southwest Quarter, Southeast
Quarter; thence South along the West Line of said Southwest Quarter, Southeast
Quarter, a distance of 640.30 feet; thence East a distance of 450.00 feet; thence
South a distance of 140.00 feet; thence South 56°35’ East a distance of 419.30 feet
to a point 290.00 feet North of the South Line of said Southwest Quarter,
Southeast Quarter; thence North a distance of 1,021.7 feet to a point on the North
Line of said Southwest Quarter, Southeast Quarter; thence South 89°15’ West
along said North Line a distance of 800.00 feet to the point of beginning.
Containing 13.9 acres more or less.
2. The commissioner of administration shall set the terms and conditions for the
conveyance as the commissioner deems reasonable. Such terms and conditions may
include, but not be limited to, the number of appraisals required and the time, place,
and terms of the conveyance.
3. The attorney general shall approve the form of the instrument of conveyance.
Section 16. 1. The governor is hereby authorized and empowered to sell,
transfer, grant, convey, remise, release, and forever quitclaim all interest of the state of
Missouri in property located in city of Potosi, Washington County, Missouri. The
property to be conveyed is more particularly described as follows:
Beginning at an iron rod 50.00 feet South 39°16’ West from a limestone
monument being corner Number Two of U.S. Survey No. 430 on the North
boundary of said Section Eleven, thence North 59°51’30” West 359.10 feet to a
steel post on the South marginal line of Mine Street, thence along said marginal
line South 39°16’ West 220.03 feet to a steel marker, thence leaving said marginal
line South 59°51’30” East 359.10 Feet to an iron rod, thence North 39°16’ East
220.03 feet to the point of beginning, containing 1.81 acres being 0.03 acres in
said Section Fourteen and 1.78 acres in said Section Eleven.
2. The commissioner of administration shall set the terms and conditions for the
conveyance as the commissioner deems reasonable. Such terms and conditions may

HCS HB 2336 23
include, but not be limited to, the number of appraisals required and the time, place,
and terms of the conveyance.
3. The attorney general shall approve the form of the instrument of conveyance.
Section 17. 1. The governor is hereby authorized and empowered to sell,
transfer, grant, convey, remise, release, and forever quitclaim all interest of the state of
Missouri in property located in the city of Springfield, Greene County, Missouri. The
property to be conveyed is more particularly described as follows:
PART OF THE SOUTH HALF OF THE NORTHEAST QUARTER OF
SECTION 18, TOWNSHIP 29 NORTH, RANGE 21 WEST IN THE CITY OF
SPRINGFIELD, GREENE COUNTY, MISSOURI, DESCRIBED AS
FOLLOWS: COMMENCING AT AN EXISTING 5/8-INCH IRON PIN IN
CONCRETE ON THE NORTH RIGHT-OF-WAY LINE OF PYTHIAN
STREET, 1118.05 FEET WEST OF THE WEST RIGHT-OF-WAY LINE OF
GLENSTONE AVENUE; THENCE N88°02’46”W ALONG THE NORTH
RIGHT-OF-WAY LINE OF PYTHIAN STREET, 173.39 FEET TO AN
EXISTING 5/8-INCH IRON PIN IN CONCRETE; THENCE N85°14’59”W
ALONG SAID RIGHT-OF-WAY LINE, 151.66 FEET TO AN EXISTING 5/8-
INCH IRON PIN AT THE SOUTHWEST CORNER OF A PARCEL OF LAND
DEEDED TO THE STATE OF MISSOURI, DEPARTMENT OF
ELEMENTARY AND SECONDARY EDUCATION AS DESCRIBED IN
BOOK 1615, PAGE 1118 AT THE GREENE COUNTY RECORDER’S
OFFICE, FOR THE POINT OF BEGINNING OF THE PARCEL
DESCRIBED HEREIN; THENCE N85°11’41”W ALONG SAID RIGHT-OF-
WAY LINE, 509.57 FEET TO AN EXISTING 5/8-INCH IRON PIN AT THE
SOUTHWEST CORNER OF A TRACT OF LAND DEEDED TO THE STATE
OF MISSOURI, DEPARTMENT OF PUBLIC HEALTH AND WELFARE AS
DESCRIBED IN BOOK 1333, PAGE 15 AT THE GREENE COUNTY
RECORDER’S OFFICE; THENCE N01°42’53”E ALONG THE WEST LINE
OF SAID DEPARTMENT OF PUBLIC HEALTH AND WELFARE TRACT,
673.02 FEET TO A 5/8-INCH IRON PIN (CAPPED “GREAT RIVER
2001011476”); THENCE LEAVING SAID WEST LINE, S88°01’21”E, 407.00
FEET TO A COTTON PICKER SPINDLE SET IN ASPHALT; THENCE N01°
42’53”E, 230.00 FEET TO A 5/8-INCH IRON PIN (CAPPED “GREAT RIVER
2001011476”) AT THE NORTHEAST CORNER OF A PARCEL OF LAND
DEEDED TO ARC PROPERTY MANAGEMENT, LLC AS DESCRIBED IN
BOOK 2011, PAGE 018367-11 AT THE GREENE COUNTY RECORDER’S
OFFICE; THENCE S88°01’21”E, 49.19 FEET TO A COTTON PICKER

HCS HB 2336 24
SPINDLE AT THE NORTHWEST CORNER OF A PARCEL OF LAND
DEEDED TO THE DEVELOPMENTAL CENTER OF THE OZARKS AS
DESCRIBED IN BOOK 1715, PAGE 1822 AT THE GREENE COUNTY
RECORDER’S OFFICE; THENCE S01°51’45”W, 393.89 FEET TO A 5/8-
INCH IRON PIN (CAPPED “GREAT RIVER 2001011476”) AT AN ANGLE
POINT IN THE WEST LINE OF A PARCEL OF LAND DEEDED TO THE
DEVELOPMENTAL CENTER OF THE OZARKS AS DESCRIBED IN BOOK
1599, PAGE 1537 AT THE GREENE COUNTY RECORDER’S OFFICE;
THENCE S42°22’19”E ALONG SAID WEST LINE, 78.96 FEET TO A 5/8-
INCH IRON PIN IN CONCRETE AT THE NORTHWEST CORNER OF A
PARCEL OF LAND DEEDED TO THE STATE OF MISSOURI,
DEPARTMENT OF ELEMENTARY AND SECONDARY EDUCATION AS
DESCRIBED IN BOOK 1615, PAGE 1118 AT THE GREENE COUNTY
RECORDER’S OFFICE; THENCE S01°52’04”W ALONG THE WEST LINE
OF SAID DEPARTMENT OF ELEMENTARY AND SECONDARY
EDUCATION PARCEL, 477.80 FEET TO THE POINT OF BEGINNING.
(BEARINGS ARE BASED ON GRID NORTH, MISSOURI COORDINATE
SYSTEM OF 1983, CENTRAL ZONE.)
2. The commissioner of administration shall set the terms and conditions for the
conveyance as the commissioner deems reasonable. Such terms and conditions may
include, but not be limited to, the number of appraisals required and the time, place,
and terms of the conveyance.
3. The attorney general shall approve the form of the instrument of conveyance.
✔